ru: Тип проставки райзера: Дроп-тру; Плоская/стандартная; Микро/низкая проставка; Рельсовая проставка; Амортизирующая прокладка; Клиновидная/угловая; Клиновидная проставка для удлинения колесной базы; Другое
fi: Korotuslevyn tyyppi: Drop-through; Tasainen/vakio; Mikro/matala korotuspala; Rail-korotuspala; Iskunvaimenninpala; Kiila/kulmikas; Akseliväliä pidentävä kiila; Muu
ja: ライザーパッドタイプ: ドロップスルー; フラット / スタンダード; マイクロ / ローライザー; レールライザー; ショックパッド; ウェッジ / アングルド; ホイールベースエクステンションウェッジ; その他
fr: Type de cale de rehausse: Drop-through; Plat/standard; Micro/surélévation basse; Surélévation de rail; Amortisseur; Incliné/angulaire; Extension d’empattement inclinée; Autre
es: Tipo de almohadilla elevadora: Drop-through; Plano/estándar; Micro/bajo; Elevador de riel; Almohadilla amortiguadora; En cuña/angulado; Cuña de extensión de distancia entre ejes; Otro
de: Typ des Riser-Pads: Drop-Through; Flach/Standard; Micro/Low-Riser; Rail-Riser; Shockpad; Keil/Abgewinkelt; Keil für Radstandsverlängerung; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de almofada de elevação: Drop-through; Plano/padrão; Micro/baixo; Riser de trilho; Shock pad; Cunha/angular; Cunha de extensão da distância entre eixos; Outro
el: Τύπος βάσης στήριξης: Drop-through; Επίπεδο/Τυπικό; Micro/Χαμηλό riser; Riser ράγας; Αντικραδασμικό κάλυμμα (shock pad); Σφηνοειδές/Με γωνία; Σφήνα επέκτασης μεταξονίου; Άλλο
nb: Type forhøyningspute: Drop-through; Flat/standard; Mikro/lav riser; Rail-riser; Shock-pad; Kile/vinklet; Akselavstandsforlengende kile; Annet
pl: Typ podkładki riser: Drop-through; Płaskie/standardowe; Niskie/micro; Typu rail; Podkładka amortyzująca (shock pad); Klinowe/kątowe; Klinowe przedłużenie rozstawu osi; Inne
lt-LT: Pakėlimo tarpiklio tipas: Įleidžiamas („Drop-through“); Plokščias / standartinis; Mikro / žemas paaukštinimas; Bėgelio paaukštinimas; Smūgius sugerianti tarpinė; Pleištinis / kampinis; Ratų bazės prailginimo pleištas; Kita
en: Riser pad type: Drop-through; Flat/Standard; Micro/Low riser; Rail riser; Shock pad; Wedge/Angled; Wheelbase extension wedge; Other
zh-TW: 墊片類型: 穿透式; 平面/標準; 微型/低避震墊; 軌道式增高墊; 避震墊; 楔形/傾斜; 軸距加長楔形墊; 其他
bg-BG: Тип подложка за повдигане: Drop-through; Плосък/стандартен; Микро/нисък райзър; Рейл райзър; Шоков пад; Клиновиден/под ъгъл; Клиновиден удължител на междуосието; Други
cs: Typ podpěry: Drop-through; Plochá/standardní; Mikro / nízká podložka; Kolejnicová podložka; Tlumicí podložka; Klínová/úhlová; Klínová podložka pro prodloužení rozvoru; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta podložke za podvozje: Drop-through; Ravno / standardno; Mikro / nizko; Dvižna podloga (rail); Blažilna podloga; Klinasto / pod kotom; Klin za podaljšanje medosne razdalje; Drugo
nl: Riser pad type: Drop-through; Plat/standaard; Micro/lage riser; Rail-riser; Shockpad; Wig/gehoekt; Wielbasisverlenging-wig; Overige
vi: Loại tấm nâng: Drop-through; Phẳng/Tiêu chuẩn; Nâng thấp/siêu nhỏ; Nâng dạng thanh; Miếng đệm giảm sốc; Dạng nêm/nghiêng; Nêm mở rộng chiều dài cơ sở; Khác
sv: Typ av förhöjningsplatta: Drop-through; Platt/standard; Mikro/låg riser; Rail riser; Shock pad; Kil/vinklad; Kil för förlängd hjulbas; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de înălțător pentru ax: Drop-through; Plat/Standard; Micro/Redus; Rail riser; Garnitură antișoc; Pană/Înclinat; Pană pentru extensia ampatamentului; Altele
da: Type forhøjningsplade: Drop-through; Flad/standard; Mikro-/lav riser; Rail riser; Shock pad; Kileformet/vinklet; Kile til forlængelse af akselafstand; Andet
th: แผ่นรองยกสูง: ดรอปทรู; แบน/มาตรฐาน; แผ่นรองต่ำ/ไมโคร; แผ่นรองแบบราง; แผ่นรองกันกระแทก; ลิ่ม/ทำมุม; ลิ่มขยายระยะฐานล้อ; อื่นๆ
ko: 라이저 패드 유형: 드롭 스루; 플랫/표준; 마이크로/로우 라이저; 레일 라이저; 쇼크 패드; 웨지/앵글; 휠베이스 익스텐션 웨지; 기타
tr: Yükseltici ped tipi: Drop-through; Düz/standart; Mikro/alçak yükseltici; Ray yükseltici; Şok pedi; Kamalı/açılı; Dingil mesafesi uzatma kaması; Diğer
zh-CN: 增高垫片类型: 下沉式; 平口/标准; 微型/低垫片; 导轨垫片; 减震垫; 楔形/倾斜; 轴距加长楔形垫片; 其他
hu: Emelőbetét típusa: Drop-through; Lapos / normál; Mikro / alacsony emelő; Sínemelő; Rezgéscsillapító; Ék / döntött; Tengelytáv-növelő ék; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta podloge za podizanje: Drop-through; Ravno/standardno; Mikro/niski podložak; Podložak za vodilicu; Podložak za amortizaciju; Klinasti/pod kutom; Klin za produženje međuosovinskog razmaka; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ podložky: Drop-through; Plochá/štandardná; Mikro/nízka podložka; Koľajnicová podložka; Tlmiaca podložka; Klinová/uhlová; Klin na predĺženie rázvoru; Iná
it: Tipo di cuscinetto rialzato: Drop-through; Piatto/standard; Micro/basso; Rialzo per rail; Shock pad; A cuneo/angolato; Cuneo per estensione passo; Altro
pt-BR: Calço elevador tipo: Drop-through; Plano/Padrão; Micro/Baixo; Riser de trilho; Shock pad; Cunha/Inclinado; Cunha de extensão de distância entre eixos; Outro